Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-2,157
Amendment pursuant to reorganization.

(MBCA 10.08) (a) A corporation's
articles of incorporation may be amended without action by the board of directors
or shareholders to carry out a plan of reorganization ordered or decreed by
a court of competent jurisdiction under the authority of a law of the United
States.

(b) The individual or
individuals designated by the court shall deliver to the Secretary of State
for filing articles of amendment setting forth:

(1) The name of the corporation;

(2) The text of each
amendment approved by the court;

(3) The date of the court's order or decree approving
the articles of amendment;

(4) The title of the reorganization proceeding in
which the order or decree was entered; and

(5) A statement that the court had jurisdiction of
the proceeding under federal statute.

(c) This section does not apply after entry of a final
decree in the reorganization proceeding even though the court retains jurisdiction
of the proceeding for limited purposes unrelated to consummation of the reorganization
plan.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 157.
January 1, 2017